District of Columbia statutes.
38-209

Reporting requirements.

By July 15 of each year, beginning in 2014, the Office of the Attorney General shall submit to the Mayor and the Secretary to the Council a truancy status report on the preceding school year, which shall include the number of:

(1)

Referrals it received from each educational institution;

(2)

Cases it filed pursuant to this subchapter, and the outcome of each;

(3)

Child-in-need of supervision cases filed pursuant to this subchapter, and the outcome of each; and

(4)

Students who were enrolled in a court diversion program, or other diversion program pursuant to this subchapter.

Feb. 4, 1925, ch. 140, Art. II, § 8
as added Sept. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 20-17, § 101(b)(2), 60 DCR 9839
2001 Ed., § 38-254.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-17 added this section.